District of Columbia statutes.
4-210.08

Time, date, and place of hearing.

The hearing shall be held at a time, date, and place designated by the Mayor’s agent. Adequate notice shall be given the claimant and his or her representative, including such information concerning hearing procedures as may be necessary for his or her effective preparation therefor. If the claimant shall notify the Mayor’s agent that either the time or place designated by the Mayor’s agent is not convenient to him or her and requests a new time or place for such hearing, the hearing officer shall designate another time or place which is convenient to the claimant if he or she deems the claimant has sufficient reason for so requesting a change.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1008, 29 DCR 1060
1981 Ed., § 3-210.8.